Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1543.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CAREER PATHWAYS PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Program description. new text end new text begin The career pathways program must encourage, support, and provide continuity for student participation in structured career pathways. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin (a) $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the workforce development fund to the Department of Labor and Industry for a grant to Independent School District No. 294, Houston, for the Minnesota Virtual Academy's career pathways program with Operating Engineers Local 49. The program may include up to five semesters of courses and must lead to eligibility into the Operating Engineers Local 49 apprenticeship program. new text end new text begin (b) The grant may be used to encourage and support student participation in the career pathways program through additional academic, counseling, and other support services provided by the student's enrolling school district. The Minnesota Virtual Academy may contract with a student's enrolling school district to provide these services. new text end new text begin (c) This appropriation does not cancel and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Career pathways outreach. new text end new text begin The career pathways program must provide outreach to and encourage participation in its programming by students of color, Indigenous students, students from families with low income, students located throughout Minnesota, and underserved students. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin On January 15 of each year following the receipt of a grant, Independent School District No. 294, Houston, must submit a written report to the legislative committees having jurisdiction over education and workforce development. A grant award and report must be in accordance with the provisions of Minnesota Statutes, sections 3.195 and 127A.20. The report must describe students' experiences with the program. The report must document the program's spending and the number of students participating in the program and entering into the apprenticeship program. The report must include geographic and demographic information on the program participants, make recommendations to improve the support of career pathways programs statewide, and make recommendations to improve student participation in career pathways programs. new text end